Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Penalties

45A.990.
Penalties.

Any violation of KRS

45A.045

shall be deemed a Class D felony.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

45A.325

shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Any firm, corporation, or association which violates any of the provisions of KRS

45A.325

shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

Any person who violates any provisions of KRS

45A.330

to

45A.340

shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor, and in addition he shall be adjudged to have forfeited any statutory office or employment which he may hold.

Any willful violation of KRS

45A.690

to

45A.725

shall be a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who willfully violates this code shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any employee or any official of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, elective or appointive, who shall take, receive, or offer to take or receive, either directly or indirectly, any rebate, percentage of contract, money, or other things of value, as an inducement or intended inducement, in the procurement of business, or the giving of business, for, or to, or from, any person, partnership, firm, or corporation, offering, bidding for, or in open market seeking to make sales to the Commonwealth of Kentucky, shall be deemed guilty of a Class C felony.

Every person, firm, or corporation offering to make, or pay, or give, any rebate, percentage of contract, money or any other thing of value, as an inducement or intended inducement, in the procurement of business, or the giving of business, to any employee or to any official of the Commonwealth, elective or appointive, in his efforts to bid for, or offer for sale, or to seek in the open market, shall be deemed guilty of a Class C felony.

Criminal penalties for violations of the laws which are in existence on January 1, 1980, shall not be impaired.

This section shall not apply to any officer or employee of a political subdivision, including a school district, nor to the procurement activities of any such political subdivision unless such political subdivision has elected to operate under KRS

45A.345

through

45A.460

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, §§ 69, 94; 1980, ch. 40, § 3, effective March 12, 1980; 1980, ch. 250, § 17, effective April 9, 1980; 1990, ch. 496, § 22, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 463, § 7, effective July 14, 1992.